Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 2 Department of Agriculture

Cross references.

Power of department as to animals, T. 4 generally.

Power of department as to petroleum products, T. 10, C. 1, Art. 8.

Power of department as to weights and measures, T. 10, C. 2.

Power of department as to warehousemen, T. 10, C. 4.

Power of department as to food, T. 26, C. 2.

Powers and duties of Department of Agriculture regarding manufacture, reupholstering, or renovation of articles of bedding, T. 31, C. 25.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Administration, Subject 40-1-1.

Milk and milk products, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-2.

2-2-1.
Department of Agriculture established.

There is established a Department of Agriculture for this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 5, § 1; Code 1882, § 1465a; Civil Code 1895, § 1789; Civil Code 1910, § 2065; Code 1933, § 5-101.

2-2-2.
Commissioner of Agriculture — Qualifications; election; location of office.

The department shall be under the control and management of the Commissioner of Agriculture, who shall be a practical farmer, elected by qualified voters at the same time, in the same manner, and under the same rules and regulations as the Governor and statehouse officers are elected. The office of the Commissioner shall be at the capital of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 5, § 2; Code 1882, § 1465b; Ga. L. 1889, p. 63, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1790; Civil Code 1910, § 2066; Code 1933, §§ 5-102, 5-103, 5-104; Ga. L. 1943, p. 126, § 1.

Cross references.

Qualifications of Commissioner, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. III, Para. II.

2-2-3.
Commissioner of Agriculture — Term of office; removal.

The term of office of the Commissioner shall be for four years or until his successor is elected and qualified, unless he is removed in the manner prescribed by law for the removal of officers of the state government.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 5, § 7; Code 1882, § 1465g; Ga. L. 1889, p. 63, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1790; Civil Code 1910, § 2066; Ga. L. 1927, p. 207, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 5-103; Ga. L. 1935, p. 98, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1152, § 2.

2-2-4.
Commissioner of Agriculture — Salary and expenses; compensation of employees.

The annual salary of the Commissioner shall be as provided in Code Sections 45-7-3 and 45-7-4. The Commissioner shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses as provided by Code Section 45-7-20.

The Commissioner is authorized to employ personnel for the department, to prescribe their duties, and to fix the compensation of such personnel; provided, however, that such compensation shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 5, § 3; Code 1882, § 1465c; Civil Code 1895, § 1791; Ga. L. 1905, p. 73, § 1; Ga. L. 1906, p. 110, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2067; Ga. L. 1919, p. 75, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 92, § 1; Code 1933, § 5-105; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 376, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 106, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 586, § 1A; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-2/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

2-2-5.
Commissioner of Agriculture — Bond.

The Commissioner shall give a bond of $50,000.00 as a guaranty of the faithful performance of the duties of his office and for the proper accounting for all moneys, fees, etc., received by his office. The bond shall be furnished by a surety company authorized to do business in Georgia by the laws of this state. The premium on the bond shall be paid by the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 206, § 1; Code 1933, § 5-106.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

2-2-6.
Commissioner of Agriculture — Acceptance of cash, government bonds, treasury notes, or equivalency in lieu of bond.

In all cases where a licensee or an applicant for a license is required to post a bond with the Commissioner, the Commissioner is authorized to accept cash, government bonds, treasury notes, or their equivalent in lieu of the bond where the licensee or applicant cannot obtain the prescribed bond. All such funds shall be held in trust by the Commissioner and shall be subject to the payment by the Commissioner of all claims to which the bond would be subject.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 630, § 1.

2-2-7.
Commissioner of Agriculture — Powers and duties.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall serve as the chief administrative officer of the Department of Agriculture. The Commissioner shall be responsible for the enforcement of all duties imposed upon him by law. In addition to any other powers which may be conferred upon him, the Commissioner may:

Examine and investigate any matter relating to or affecting the welfare of farmers and consumers of the state;

Gather, formulate, and disseminate, in such form and in such manner as he shall deem advisable, information which may benefit the farmers and consumers of this state;

Participate in any show, fair, or exhibit in order to advance the agricultural industry in this state and make the public aware of the services offered by the Department of Agriculture;

Promulgate rules and regulations concerning the operations of the department and such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out and enforce the duties and responsibilities imposed upon him by law;

Secure the cooperation and assistance of the other departments and agencies of this state, or the other states, any department or agency of the United States, or any other organization that may be of assistance; and

Participate as a member of, or in an advisory capacity to, any organization or association which is of benefit to the agricultural community or consumers of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 5, § 4; Code 1882, § 1465d; Ga. L. 1893, p. 136, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1792; Civil Code 1910, § 2068; Code 1933, § 5-107.

Cross references.

Power of Commissioner to employ a state veterinarian, §

4-1-2

.

Powers and duties of Commissioner in regard to prevention and control of disease in cattle, horses, and other livestock, T. 4, C. 4.

Powers and duties of Commissioner with regard to sale of petroleum products, brake fluid, and antifreeze, §

10-1-140

et seq.

Powers and duties of Commissioner with regard to enforcement of laws and regulations pertaining to weights and measures, T. 10, C. 2.

Designation of Commissioner as state warehouse commissioner, §

10-4-50

.

2-2-8.
Educational exhibits promoting state resources at agricultural fairs authorized.

The Commissioner is authorized to advertise and promote the agricultural resources of this state through the use of educational exhibits at agricultural fairs. When he so desires, the Commissioner is authorized to establish such exhibits in cooperation with the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Georgia, and other departments of this state.

For an event to qualify as an agricultural fair, the organization sponsoring such fair must:

Be able to show that at least 10 percent of the total receipts thereof are paid out in the form of premiums, scholarships, or agricultural programs; and

Be a nonprofit organization, spending the profits of the fair on the enterprise or paying them out in the form of premiums, scholarships, or educational programs.

Transportation costs, space rental, and utility costs at any agricultural fair shall be borne by the organization sponsoring such fair.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit governmental agencies from participating in or exhibiting the resources of this state at any agricultural fair.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 197, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2.

2-2-8.1.
Contributions for Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin and Poultry Market News.

The Commissioner is authorized to publicize and request, by means of publication of appropriate notices in the

Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin

and the

Poultry Market News

, contributions to be used exclusively for the compilation, publication, printing, and distribution of the

Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin

and the

Poultry Market News

.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-2-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 353, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-2/HB 1055.

Information and Education.

Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-8.

2-2-9.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is empowered to make all necessary rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying out the purposes of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 5, § 5; Code 1882, § 1465e; Civil Code 1895, § 1793; Civil Code 1910, § 2083; Code 1933, § 5-108.

Cross references.

Procedures for adoption of rules and regulations, T. 50, C. 13.

2-2-9.1.
“Aggrieved or adversely affected” defined; administrative authority of Commissioner; hearing for individuals adversely affected; penalties; final decisions; judicial review of final decisions.

As used in this Code section, the term “aggrieved or adversely affected” means that the challenged action has caused or will cause the person injury in fact, and the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by the statute that the Commissioner is empowered to administer and enforce.

The Commissioner shall issue all orders and perform actions to include impoundments; quarantine; the issuance, suspension, denial, or revocation of registrations, licenses, or permits; or approval or denial of applications for registrations, licenses, or permits provided for in such federal and state laws as are to be enforced by the Department of Agriculture.

Any administrative order issued by the Commissioner shall specify the alleged violation, monetary penalty, or other sanction; prescribe a reasonable time for some type of action to be accomplished; and provide notice of the right to a hearing. Any order issued pursuant to this Code section shall become final unless the aggrieved or adversely affected registrant, licensee, permittee, applicant, equine owner, livestock owner, dog or cat owner, exotic and pet bird owner, or farmer of crops or livestock, chickens, or other animals timely requests a hearing in writing as provided by this Code section.

Any registrant, licensee, permittee, applicant, equine owner, livestock owner, dog or cat owner, exotic and pet bird owner, or farmer of crops or livestock, chickens, or other animals aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the Commissioner to include the issuance, suspension, denial, or revocation of a registration, license, permit, or application; impoundment; quarantine; or stop sale, stop use, or stop removal order; upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or the taking of such action, shall have a right to a hearing before a hearing officer appointed or designated for such purpose by the Commissioner. The decision of the hearing officer shall constitute an initial decision of the Department of Agriculture, and any party to the hearing, including the Commissioner, shall have the right to final agency review before the Commissioner in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the provisions of this chapter.

Where a statute for which the Commissioner has responsibility for administration or enforcement or a provision of Article 1 of Chapter 13 of Title 50 provides for different administrative procedures in providing for a notice and opportunity to be heard other than those specified in this Code section, the Commissioner may elect which procedure to be used on a case-by-case basis.

In the event the Commissioner asserts in response to the petition before the hearing officer that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the hearing officer shall take evidence and hear arguments on such issue and thereafter make a ruling on such issue before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on such issue shall rest with the petitioner. The decision of the hearing officer shall constitute the initial decision of the Commissioner; and any party to the hearing, including the Commissioner, shall have the right for final agency review before the Commissioner in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

Prior to notice, hearing, or determination, the Commissioner is authorized to impose civil penalties in settlement of contested cases through administrative consent orders. The Commissioner is authorized to impose through administrative consent orders civil penalties of up to and including the applicable maximum amounts provided by paragraph (1) of subsection (h) of this Code section. Any civil penalties recovered shall be paid over into the general fund of the state treasury in accordance with Code Section 45-12-92.

The Commissioner may seek civil penalties for the violation of those laws to be enforced by the Department of Agriculture; and where the imposition of such civil penalties is provided for therein, the Commissioner upon written request may cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed or designated by the Commissioner for the purpose of determining whether such civil penalties should be imposed in accordance with the applicable law; and where the imposition of such civil penalties is not provided for therein but violation of such law is punishable as a criminal offense, the Commissioner upon written request may cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed or designated by the Commissioner for the purpose of determining whether civil penalties in an amount not to exceed $1,000.00 per violation should be imposed. Any civil penalties recovered shall be paid over into the general fund of the state treasury in accordance with Code Section 45-12-92. The Commissioner may require any person to obtain a surety bond on the balance of a monetary penalty or suspended portion of a monetary penalty imposed on such person pursuant to a consent order or final decision from which no further review is taken or allowed. If any aggrieved or adversely affected party fails to follow the terms of such consent order or final decision, the Commissioner may commence and maintain an action against the principal and surety on the bond.

The decision of the hearing officer shall constitute the initial decision of the Commissioner; and any party to the hearing, including the Commissioner, shall have the right of final agency review before the Commissioner in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

In rendering a decision on a requested civil penalty, the hearing officer shall consider all relevant factors including, but not limited to, the following:

The amount of civil penalty necessary to ensure immediate and continued compliance and the extent to which the violator may have profited by failing or delaying to comply;

The conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty in promptly taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to comply with or to correct the violation or failure to comply;

Any prior violations of, or failures by, such person to comply with statutes, rules, regulations, or orders administered, adopted, or issued by the Commissioner;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with public health or safety which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure to comply;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure to comply; and

The character and degree of intent with which the conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty was carried out.

Once the hearing officer issues an initial decision, that decision may be appealed by any party to the Commissioner for final agency review. The party requesting final agency review shall have 30 days from notice of the initial decision to file an application for final agency review. If the initial decision is not appealed within 30 days by any party, it shall be deemed final without need of any further proceedings.

In application, the party requesting final agency review from the Commissioner shall include a short and plain statement of:

The reasons for seeking review; and

Any alleged errors in the initial decision.

The Commissioner may in his or her discretion seek review on his or her own motion pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 50-13-17.

Opposing parties may submit statements in response within 20 days of service of an application for final agency review.

A copy of any application for final agency review or in opposition of application for review shall be served on all parties and their counsel as well as the Commissioner.

The standard for final agency review of the initial decision shall be de novo review.

The Commissioner may only review the record considered by the hearing officer in the initial decision hearing. The Commissioner shall not rely on investigative files.

The Commissioner shall possess all the powers that the hearing officer had during the initial decision hearing.

There shall be a presumption of correctness for the hearing officer’s credibility determination of witnesses appearing before the hearing officer.

The Commissioner shall not base his or her decision on conjecture, speculation, or impermissible inferences.

The hearing officer shall forward to the Commissioner prior to review:

A copy of the record of the case including the initial decision;

All pleadings;

Transcripts of the hearing; and

All exhibits.

During the final agency review, the Commissioner may hear or take testimony from any party, including the registrant, licensee, permittee, applicant, equine owner, livestock owner, dog or cat owner, exotic and pet bird owner, or farmer of crops or livestock, chickens, or other animals based on such authority as existed during the initial decision hearing.

A party may file a motion not less than 14 days prior to the date of the final agency review to introduce evidence not submitted at the initial decision hearing. Additional evidence may be admitted only if it is material and if good cause exists for not presenting the evidence at the initial decision hearing. Opposing parties may submit responding motions in support of suppression of additional evidence seven days prior to the final agency review. Copies of all motions shall be served on the other party and its counsel as well as the Commissioner.

The final decision shall be in writing, and if an initial decision is modified, the Commissioner shall give his or her reasons therefor in the form of findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated, along with the effective date of the final decision. If the Commissioner does not issue a final decision within 30 days, the initial decision shall be deemed final without need of further proceedings. Further, once the initial decision is final, a party’s right to judicial review shall be extinguished.

The Commissioner’s final decision shall be rendered not later than 30 days from the date of the filing of an application for final agency review unless such period is extended pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection.

The Commissioner may modify sanctions after review of an initial decision on appeal, stating the sanctions in the final decision. The Commissioner shall not have to make separate findings of fact to justify modified sanctions.

The period of decision may be extended due to complexity of issues or volume of record materials. All parties involved shall be notified of any extension. A decision shall be rendered as soon as practicable.

The Commissioner shall serve on the:

Opposing party;

Opposing party’s counsel;

Agency counsel; and

Original hearing officer

any resulting decision or notify the above parties if there is no change to the initial decision along with a statement of rights on appeal to the opposing party and counsel within 30 days of any such decision.

A party, or the Commissioner on his or her own motion, may seek reconsideration by the Commissioner of a final agency decision.

A party’s written request for reconsideration must be submitted to the Commissioner within ten days of service of the final decision. The request shall include a short and plain statement of:

All matters alleged to have been erroneously decided; and

Any newly discovered factual matters and the reasons why any matters were not raised previously.

Opposing parties may submit statements in response within 20 days of service of the request of the consideration.

All requests for reconsideration and statements in opposition shall be served on all parties and the Commissioner.

If the final agency decision is modified, the Commissioner shall give his or her reasons therefor in the form of findings of fact and conclusions of law along with the effective date of the decision.

The Commissioner’s reconsideration decision shall be rendered within 30 days following the latest filing deadline.

Judicial review of the Commissioner’s final decision may be had in accordance with Code Section 50-13-19.

Any order issued by the Commissioner under the laws of this state to be enforced by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to a final decision, either unappealed from as provided by law or affirmed or modified on any review or appeal, and from which no further review is taken or allowed, may be filed, by certified copy of the order or final decision from the department, in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides, or if such person is a corporation in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate; whereupon such superior court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

The Commissioner may commence an action in any superior court of proper venue to enforce any order issued by him or her and made an order of the superior court pursuant to this Code section.

If a judicial review of the Commissioner’s final decision is sought in accordance with Code Section 50-13-19, and the matter involves the impoundment of equines under Chapter 13 of Title 4, the “Georgia Humane Care for Equines Act,” the Commissioner shall, along with his or her answer to the petition, include a statement of the costs incurred in the impoundment and care of the impounded animal or animals and an estimate of the future costs expected to be incurred in the care of the impounded animal or animals. The judge of the superior court may then require the petitioner to submit a surety bond to the court in an amount necessary to provide for the reasonable costs of care for the impounded animal or animals. In lieu of a surety bond, the court may accept a cash bond or property bond, which shall in all respects be subject to the same claims and actions as would exist against a surety bond.

Upon the entering of a final adverse decision against an aggrieved party by the superior court, the Commissioner shall within 15 days deliver to the court and to the aggrieved party a statement of the costs incurred in the impoundment and care of the impounded animal or animals. The aggrieved party shall then render payment of such costs to the Commissioner within 15 days after the service of the statement of the costs. If the aggrieved party fails to render payment to the Commissioner within the time period required in this paragraph, the Commissioner may commence and maintain an action against the principal and surety on the bond of the aggrieved party as in any civil action.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-2-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 598, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 446, § 1/SB 152; Ga. L. 2012, p. 698, § 1/HB 746; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1116, § 1/SB 367.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section
§

28-9-5

, in 2004, “section” was substituted for “Section” in subsection (a), punctuation was revised in subsections (b) and (d), and “for” was inserted after “statute” in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 446, § 7/SB 152, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to violations occurring on or after May 1, 2009.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

2-2-10.
Imposition of penalty authorized in lieu of other action; funding to general treasury.

In any proceeding before the Commissioner involving a license, certificate, or registration issued by the Commissioner or a violation of the laws administered and enforced by the Commissioner and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, after notice, hearing, and a determination by him or her as provided by law that there are sufficient grounds to revoke, suspend, or cancel the license, certificate, or registration involved or to take any other action authorized by law in regard to the violation in question, the Commissioner may impose a reasonable penalty for each offense in lieu of a revocation, suspension, cancellation, or other authorized action. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, such a penalty shall be imposed only with the consent of the affected party; and except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the amount of any such penalty shall not exceed $1,000.00.

In any case subject to this Code section which involves a violation or attempted violation of Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 26, the “Georgia Food Act,” the maximum penalty shall not exceed the greater of $1,000.00 or the amount of gain realized or sought to be realized through such violation, but in no event shall such penalty exceed $20,000.00; and in any case involving a violation or attempted violation of the “Georgia Food Act,” the written consent of the person against whom the penalty is to be imposed shall not be required.

Any civil penalties recovered shall be paid over into the general fund of the state treasury in accordance with Code Section 45-12-92.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 245, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1444, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1300, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 838, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 446, § 2/SB 152; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 2/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 26, the ‘Georgia Food Act,’ ” for “the ‘Georgia Food Act,’ Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 26,” in the middle of subsection (b).

2-2-11.
Inspection warrants.

Whenever the Constitution or laws of the United States or the State of Georgia require the issuance of a warrant to make an inspection under any law administered by the Commissioner of Agriculture or the Department of Agriculture, the procedure set forth in paragraphs (1) through (7) of this Code section shall be employed.

The Commissioner or any person authorized to make inspections for the Commissioner shall make application for an inspection warrant to a person who is a judicial officer within the meaning of Code Section 17-5-21.

An inspection warrant shall be issued only upon cause and when supported by an affidavit particularly describing the place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for which the inspection is to be made. In addition, the affidavit shall contain either a statement that consent to inspect has been sought and refused or facts or circumstances reasonably justifying the failure to seek such consent. Cause shall be deemed to exist if either reasonable legislative or administrative standards for conducting a routine or area inspection are satisfied with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle, or there is reason to believe that a condition of nonconformity exists with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle.

An inspection warrant shall be effective for the time specified therein, but not for a period of more than 14 days, unless extended or renewed by the judicial officer who signed and issued the original warrant, upon satisfying himself that such extension or renewal is in the public interest. Such inspection warrant must be executed and returned to the judicial officer by whom it was issued within the time specified in the warrant or within the extended or renewed time. After the expiration of such time, the warrant, unless executed, is void.

An inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant shall be made between 8:00 A.M. and 6:00 P.M. of any day or at any time during operating or regular business hours. An inspection should not be performed in the absence of an owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle unless specifically authorized by the judicial officer upon a showing that such authority is reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose of the regulation being enforced. An inspection pursuant to a warrant shall not be made by means of forcible entry, except that the judicial officer may expressly authorize a forcible entry where facts are shown which are sufficient to create a reasonable suspicion of a violation of this title or any other law administered by the Commissioner or the department, which, if such violation existed, would be an immediate threat to health or safety, or where facts are shown establishing that reasonable attempts to serve a previous warrant have been unsuccessful. Where prior consent has been sought and refused and a warrant has been issued, the warrant may be executed without further notice to the owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.

It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to allow an inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant issued as provided in this Code section. Any person violating this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Under this Code section, an inspection warrant is an order, in writing, signed by a judicial officer, directed to the Commissioner or any person authorized to make inspections for the Commissioner, and commanding him or her to conduct any inspection required or authorized by this title or any other law administered by the Commissioner or the department or regulations promulgated pursuant to this title or any other law administered by the Commissioner or the department.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require an inspection warrant when a warrantless inspection is authorized by law or a permit issued under this title or any other law administered by the Commissioner or the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-2-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 390, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 253 (1989).

2-2-12.
Assistance to United States Department of Agriculture in inspection, certification, and identification of agricultural products and collection of fees.

It is the intent of this Code section to authorize the department to assist the United States Department of Agriculture, pursuant to the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946, 7 U.S.C. Sections 1621-1627, in the inspection and certification of products in commerce to the end that agricultural products may be marketed to the best advantage, that trading may be facilitated, and that consumers may be able to obtain the quality product which they desire.

The department is authorized to assist the United States Department of Agriculture in the inspection, certification, and identification of the class, quality, quantity, and condition of agricultural products when shipped or received in commerce, under such rules as the secretary of agriculture may prescribe, including collection of such fees as will be reasonable and as will cover the cost of the service rendered. Such fees shall not be considered taxes, fees, or assessments for state purposes but shall be collected under authority of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 for purposes of assisting the United States Department of Agriculture in carrying out its mission under said act.

The department may enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture and with any firm, corporation, association, or organization having the capacity to contract for the purpose of assisting the United States Department of Agriculture in the inspection, certification, and identification of the class, quality, quantity, and condition of agricultural products when shipped or received in commerce and in the collection of such fees as will be reasonable and as will cover the cost of the service rendered.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-2-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 327, § 1.

2-2-13.
Enforcement of laws and rules within jurisdiction of Commissioner; employment of investigators.

The Commissioner shall be vested with police powers to enforce those laws governing matters within the jurisdiction of the Commissioner or the department as provided by this title and Titles 4, 10, 26, and 43 and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to prevent, detect, and respond to acts of bioterrorism, other terroristic acts or threats, or natural disasters affecting or potentially affecting plants, animals, products, or facilities that are subject to regulation by the department.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to employ, designate, and deputize investigators and to delegate to such employees of the department the necessary authority to enforce those laws governing matters within the jurisdiction of the Commissioner or the department as provided by this title and Titles 4, 10, 26, and 43 and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to prevent, detect, and respond to acts of bioterrorism, other terroristic acts or threats, or natural disasters affecting or potentially affecting plants, animals, products, or facilities that are subject to regulation by the department. Employees who have been so designated by the Commissioner and who have been certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council as having successfully completed the course of training required by Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act,” shall be authorized:

To carry firearms authorized or issued by the Commissioner while in the performance of their duties;

To inspect plants, animals, products, or facilities when the same are subject to regulation by the department;

To stop and inspect any vehicle transporting plants, animals, or products when the same are subject to regulation by the department;

To inspect and require the production of health certificates, waybills, permits, or other documents required by federal or state laws, rules, regulations, or orders for the transportation of plants, animals, or products when the same are subject to regulation by the department;

To protect any life or property when the circumstances demand action; and

To arrest any person found to be in violation of a criminal law when enforcement of such law is authorized under this subsection.

From funds appropriated or available to the department, the Commissioner shall be authorized to provide motor vehicles, uniforms, firearms, and any other equipment and supplies needed by employees of the department to carry out this Code section.

This Code section shall not repeal, supersede, alter, or affect the power of any other law enforcement officer of this state or of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state. At the request of the Commissioner of Agriculture, it shall be the duty of all state, county, municipal, and other law enforcement officers in this state to enforce and to assist the Commissioner and the employees and agents of the department in the enforcement of those laws governing matters within the jurisdiction of the Commissioner or the department as provided by this title and Titles 4, 10, 26, and 43.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 425, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 572, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-2-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 575, § 1/SB 429.